District of Columbia statutes.
1-1131.02

Repealed

Partnership contributions.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-204, § 4, 40 DCR 1
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(e), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1441.2.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(e) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
Addition by Initiative 41: D.C. Law 9-204 was enacted by the electors of the District of Columbia in Initiative Measure 41.